Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 13.1. Certified Nursing Facility Education Initiative.

§ 32.1-353.1.
Certified nursing facility education initiative; purpose.

The General Assembly finds that early identification of potential certified nursing facility deficiencies, coupled with the opportunity to correct any such problems, will improve quality of care and life to certified nursing facility residents in the Commonwealth. In order to implement the General Assembly’s finding, early on-site training and assistance shall be provided to certified nursing facilities that are found not in substantial compliance with long-term care requirements and that meet certain requirements as set forth in the Nursing Facility Quality Improvement Program developed pursuant to §

32.1-353.3

.

Creative and innovative approaches to the provision of long-term care services may also be explored. Such measures can best be accomplished by using the data, expertise, and knowledge of representatives of state government and representatives from the consumer, long-term care provider, and business communities. For this reason, the Board of Medical Assistance Services, assisted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services, shall administer the education initiatives for certified nursing facility care established by this chapter.

History.

2000, c. 475; 2003, c. 481; 2007, c. 474.

Editor’s note.

Section

32.1-353.6

, which had added an expiration provision of July 1, 2003, for this chapter, was itself repealed by Acts 2003, c. 481, cl. 2.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 481 added “In order to implement the General Assembly’s finding” at the beginning of the second sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 474, in the first paragraph, in the last sentence, deleted “by a nonprofit organization” following “provided” and substituted “in the Nursing Facility Quality Improvement Program developed pursuant to §

32.1-353.3

” for “under any agreement as described in §

32.1-353.4

.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 32.1-353.2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board”
means the Board of Medical Assistance Services.

“Certified nursing facility”
means any skilled nursing facility, skilled care facility, intermediate care facility, nursing or nursing care facility, or nursing home, whether freestanding or a portion of a freestanding medical care facility, that is certified for participation as a Medicare or Medicaid provider, or both, pursuant to Title XVIII and Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act, as amended, and §

32.1-137

.

“Civil money penalty funds”
means those funds collected by the Department of Medical Assistance Services for enforcement of certified nursing facility remedies pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

History.

2000, c. 475; 2003, c. 481; 2007, c. 474.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 481, in the definition of “Certified nursing facility,” inserted “for participation” and “Title XVIII and Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act, as amended, and.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 474 deleted the definition of “Nonprofit organization,” which formerly read: “‘Nonprofit organization’ means the nonprofit, tax-exempt organization with the characteristics, expertise, and capacity to execute the powers and duties set forth for such entity in this chapter.”

§ 32.1-353.3.
Authorization to expend civil money penalty funds.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services, as administrator of the state Medicaid program, maintains a fund comprised of civil money penalties received from nursing facilities as a result of enforcement of federal survey requirements. Pursuant to federal regulations, such funds shall be used for the protection of the health or property of certified nursing facility residents.

In addition to the remedies specified in subsection A, the Director shall establish a Nursing Facility Quality Improvement Program in compliance with all applicable federal and state regulations designed to improve the health, safety, and welfare of residents in nursing facilities. The Director shall develop the Nursing Facility Quality Improvement Program in cooperation with affected state agencies, representatives of the nursing facility provider community, and advocacy groups.

History.

2000, c. 475; 2003, c. 481; 2007, c. 474.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 481, in the third sentence, substituted “may” for “shall have the authority to,” deleted “any” preceding “agreements,” substituted “nonprofit” for “non-profit,” and substituted “when in compliance” for “in accordance”; inserted “discretionary” in the next-to-last sentence; and substituted “initially used to” for “used to initially” in the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 474 added the subsection A designator; in subsection A, deleted the third through last sentences; and added subsection B.

§§ 32.1-353.4,
32.1-353.5.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 474, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-353.6.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 481, cl. 2.